District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

26-108

Making or repeating false statements.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 4, 1933, 47 Stat. 1567, ch. 274, § 7
Apr. 29, 2004, D.C. Law 15-154,§ 8, 50 DCR 10996

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 26-108.
1973 Ed., § 26-108.